Utah statutes.
26-18-605.   Utah Office of Internal Audit and Program Integrity.

The Utah Office of Internal Audit and Program Integrity:

(1)  may not be placed within the division;

(2)  shall be placed directly under, and report directly to, the executive director of the Department of Health; and

(3)  shall have full access to all records of the division.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2011 General Session

